spellchecker-languagepack-hungarian/dicts/hu_HU.aff
SFX F Y 172
SFX F   a    ábból        a
SFX F   a    ábbért       a
SFX F   a    ábbá         a
SFX F   a    ábbtól       a
SFX F   a    ábbról       a
SFX F   a    ábbra        a
SFX F   a    ábbon        a
SFX F   a    ábbnál       a
SFX F   a    ábbnak       a
SFX F   a    ábbként      a
SFX F   a    ábbikért     a
SFX F   a    ábbikul      a
SFX F   a    ábbiktól     a
SFX F   a    ábbikról     a
SFX F   a    ábbikra      a
SFX F   a    ábbikon      a
SFX F   a    ábbiknál     a
SFX F   a    ábbiknak     a
SFX F   a    ábbikká      a
SFX F   a    ábbikkal     a
SFX F   a    ábbikig      a
SFX F   a    ábbikhoz     a
SFX F   a    ábbikból     a
SFX F   a    ábbikban     a
SFX F   a    ábbikba      a
SFX F   a    ábbikat      a
SFX F   a    ábbik        a
SFX F   a    ábbig        a
SFX F   a    ábbhoz       a
SFX F   a    ábbat        a
SFX F   a    ábban        a
SFX F   a    ábbal        a
SFX F   a    ábbakért     a
SFX F   a    ábbakul      a
SFX F   a    ábbaktól     a
SFX F   a    ábbakról     a
SFX F   a    ábbakra      a
SFX F   a    ábbakon      a
SFX F   a    ábbaknál     a
SFX F   a    ábbaknak     a
SFX F   a    ábbakká      a
SFX F   a    ábbakkal     a
SFX F   a    ábbakig      a
SFX F   a    ábbakhoz     a
SFX F   a    ábbakból     a
SFX F   a    ábbakban     a
SFX F   a    ábbakba      a
SFX F   a    ábbakat      a
SFX F   a    ábbak        a
SFX F   a    ábba         a
SFX F   a    ább          a
SFX F   0    bból         [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbért        [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbá          [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbtól        [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbról        [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbra         [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbon         [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbnál        [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbnak        [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbként       [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbikért      [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbikul       [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbiktól      [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbikról      [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbikra       [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbikon       [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbiknál      [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbiknak      [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbikká       [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbikkal      [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbikig       [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbikhoz      [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbikból      [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbikban      [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbikba       [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbikat       [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbik         [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbig         [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbhoz        [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbat         [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bban         [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbal         [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbakért      [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbakul       [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbaktól      [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbakról      [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbakra       [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbakon       [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbaknál      [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbaknak      [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbakká       [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbakkal      [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbakig       [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbakhoz      [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbakból      [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbakban      [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbakba       [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbakat       [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bbak         [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bba          [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    bb           [iáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    at           [^aeináéíóő]
SFX F   0    an           [^aeáéíőű]
SFX F   0    akért        [^aeáéíő]
SFX F   0    akul         [^aeáéíő]
SFX F   0    aktól        [^aeáéíő]
SFX F   0    akról        [^aeáéíő]
SFX F   0    akra         [^aeáéíő]
SFX F   0    akon         [^aeáéíő]
SFX F   0    aknál        [^aeáéíő]
SFX F   0    aknak        [^aeáéíő]
SFX F   0    akká         [^aeáéíő]
SFX F   0    akkal        [^aeáéíő]
SFX F   0    akig         [^aeáéíő]
SFX F   0    akhoz        [^aeáéíő]
SFX F   0    akból        [^aeáéíő]
SFX F   0    akban        [^aeáéíő]
SFX F   0    akba         [^aeáéíő]
SFX F   0    akat         [^aeáéíő]
SFX F   0    ak           [^aenáéíő]
SFX F   0    abból        [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbért       [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbá         [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbtól       [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbról       [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbra        [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbon        [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbnál       [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbnak       [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbként      [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbikért     [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbikul      [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbiktól     [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbikról     [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbikra      [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbikon      [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbiknál     [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbiknak     [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbikká      [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbikkal     [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbikig      [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbikhoz     [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbikból     [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbikban     [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbikba      [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbikat      [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbik        [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbig        [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbhoz       [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbat        [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abban        [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbal        [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbakért     [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbakul      [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbaktól     [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbakról     [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbakra      [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbakon      [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbaknál     [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbaknak     [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbakká      [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbakkal     [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbakig      [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbakhoz     [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbakból     [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbakban     [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbakba      [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbakat      [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abbak        [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abba         [^aeiáéíóőúű]
SFX F   0    abb          [^aeiáéíóőúű]
